Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1311
Child removed
from home; person or court in charge of child; duties.

Except
as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, immediately
following removal of a child from his or her home pursuant to section 43-284,
the person or court in charge of the child shall:

(1) Conduct or cause to be conducted an investigation of the
child's circumstances designed to establish a safe and appropriate plan for
the rehabilitation of the foster child and family unit or permanent placement
of the child;

(2) Require that the child receive a medical examination within
two weeks of his or her removal from his or her home;

(3) Subject the child to such further diagnosis and evaluation
as is necessary;

(4) Require that the child attend the same school as prior
to the foster care placement unless the person or court in charge determines
that attending such school would not be in the best interests of the child; and

(5) Notify
the Department of Health and Human Services to identify, locate, and provide
written notification to adult relatives of the child as provided in section
43-1311.01.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 42;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 39;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 44;

Laws 2011, LB177, § 4.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.